District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.16

Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a member of the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia acting under section 16-4603.15 , a member of the Metropolitan Police Department or other law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia with responsibilities under section 16-4603.15 .

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(b)(2), 56 DCR 1572

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4603.17.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-378 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 316 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).